Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 6.
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT AND OFFICERS (CONST., ART. 6, § 1, AMENDED AND SECTIONS ADDED).

Publisher's Notes.

The enacting clause of the resolution proposing this amendment read:

“That section No. 17 of article 5 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas be amended to read as follows:

“Executive Department

“Section 1.

To amend section 1 of article 6 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas to read as follows: * * *.”

The amendment then proceeds to amend Art. 6, § 1, and to add five additional sections.

This amendment was submitted by the General Assembly (see Acts 1913, p. 1527) and voted upon at the general election, September 14, 1914, with returns as follows: for, 46,567; against, 45,206. It was declared to be in force in Combs v. Gray, 170 Ark. 956, 281 S.W. 918 (1926). See also Brickhouse v. Hill, 167 Ark. 513, 268 S.W. 865 (1925).

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 6, § 7: second Monday in September, 1915.

§ 1. Executive department.

Publisher's Notes.

This section amended Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 1, and is incorporated therein.

This section was probably superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 37, § 1, which was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 56, § 5, and replaced by § 1 of that amendment. However, Ark. Const. Amend. 56, § 1, has probably been superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 63, § 1.

§ 2. Executive power vested in Governor and Lieutenant Governor.

The executive power shall be vested in a Governor, who shall hold office for two years; a Lieutenant Governor shall be chosen at the same time and for the same term. The Governor and Lieutenant Governor elected next preceding the time when this section shall take effect shall hold office until and including the second Monday of September, and their successors shall be chosen at the general election in that year.

Publisher's Notes.

This section has probably been superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 63 as to terms of office. See also Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 2, as to power of Governor.

§ 3. Election of Governor and Lieutenant Governor.

The Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be elected at the times and places of choosing members of the Assembly. The persons respectively having the highest number of votes for Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be elected, but in case two or more shall have an equal and the highest number of votes for Governor, or for Lieutenant Governor, the two houses of the Legislature at its next annual session shall forthwith, by joint ballot, choose one of the said persons so having an equal and the highest number of votes for Governor or Lieutenant Governor.

Publisher's Notes.

In connection with this section, see Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 3.

§ 4. Lieutenant Governor acting as Governor.

In case of the impeachment of the Governor, or his or her removal from office, death, inability to discharge the powers and duties of the said office, or resignation, the powers and duties of the office, shall devolve upon the Lieutenant Governor for the residue of the term, or until the disability shall cease. When the Governor shall, with the consent of the Legislature, be out of the State, in time of war, at the head of a military force thereof, he or she shall continue commander-in-chief of all the military force of the State. [As amended by Const. Amend. 96.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section probably supersedes Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 12, in its entirety and may supersede § 14 of that article in part.

Ark. Const. Amend. 96, which amended this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 3 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 777,973 for and 296,291 against. The amendment deleted “or absence from the State” following “resignation” in the first sentence and made stylistic changes. The amendment was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

§ 5. Qualifications and duties of Lieutenant Governor — Succession to the governorship.

The Lieutenant Governor shall possess the same qualifications of eligibility for the office as the Governor. He shall be President of the Senate, but shall have only a casting vote therein in case of a tie vote. If during a vacancy of the office of Governor, the Lieutenant Governor shall be impeached, displaced, resign, die, or become incapable of performing the duties of his office or be absent from the State, the President of the Senate shall act as Governor until the vacancy be filled or the disability shall cease; and if the President of the Senate for any of the above causes shall become incapable of performing the duties pertaining to the office of Governor, the Speaker of the Assembly shall act as Governor until the vacancy be filled or the disability shall cease.

Publisher's Notes.

The third sentence of this section probably supersedes Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 13, in its entirety and may supersede § 14 of that article in part.

§ 6. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which repealed this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Before repeal, this section read:

“§ 6. Salary of Lieutenant Governor.

“The Lieutenant Governor shall receive for his services an annual salary of two thousand dollars, and shall not receive or be entitled to any other compensation, fee or perquisite, for any duty or service he may be required to perform by the Constitution or by law.”

This section was held to be superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 56, § 2 [repealed], in Berry v. Gordon, 237 Ark. 547, 376 S.W.2d 279 (1964).

For current provision concerning salary of the Lieutenant Governor, see Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 31.